Mississippi, session 2026, SB2281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following shall be codified as Section 75-35-35, Mississippi Code of 1972: 75-35-35. The following requirements must be satisfied to qualify for the custom slaughter exemption of cattle, sheep, swine and goats: (a)  Livestock producers must allow customers to inspect and choose their animal, if they so desire; (b)  Animals presented to a licensed slaughter plant may have multiple owners; (c)  Sale and/or purchase of the animal must be completed before slaughter of the animal; (d)  The name, address and telephone number of each owner must be provided to the slaughter plant before slaughter; (e)  All of the meat must be stamped "Not for Sale"; (f)  The price of the animal may be calculated per head or live weight, but not dressed weight or final weight of the meat; and (g)  The meat food products produced under this exemption shall be exclusively for the use of the owner(s) and members of their household and their nonpaying guests and employees. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.